Connecticut, session 2026, SB00246.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective October 1, 2026) The Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection shall conduct a study of natural gas rates,
including, but not limited to, any applicable demand charges, for
commercial and agricultural natural gas customers who have
intermittent peak monthly demand to determine if a significant number
of such customers are charged rates that do not fairly reflect such
customers' use due to such demand charges. If the commissioner
determines that such demand charges have the effect of unfairly
increasing rates for such customers, the commissioner shall provide
detailed recommendations concerning how such charges may be
recalculated or otherwise applied to such customers. Not later than
January 15, 2027, the commissioner shall submit a report, in accordance
with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, that contains
such recommendations to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to energy and
technology.
Governor's Action:
Approved May 11, 2026